Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 3 MOTOR VEHICLE DRIVER’S LICENSES
§ 49-315. Licenses issued to drivers.

The department shall issue to every qualifying applicant a distinguishing driver’s license as applied for, which shall bear a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, the full name, date of birth, Idaho residence address, sex, weight, height, eye color, hair color, color photograph, name of this state, date of issuance, date of expiration, license class, endorsements, restrictions, and the applicant’s signature. If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant’s driver’s license shall contain his or her alternative Idaho mailing address in place of his or her Idaho residence address. Driver’s licenses for persons under eighteen (18) years of age shall include a notation “under 18 until (month, day, year),” and driver’s licenses for persons eighteen (18) years of age to twenty-one (21) years of age shall include a notation “under 21 until (month, day, year).” No driver’s license shall be valid until it has been signed on the signature line of the license by the licensee.

Every driver’s license shall bear a color photograph of the licensee, which shall be taken by the examiner at the time the application is made. The photograph shall be taken without headgear or other clothing or device that disguises or otherwise conceals the face or head of the applicant. A waiver may be granted by the department allowing the applicant to wear headgear or other head covering for medical, religious or safety purposes as long as the face is not disguised or otherwise concealed. At the request of the applicant, a driver’s license may contain a statement or indication of the medical condition of the licensee.

The department shall notify the commercial driver license information system that a class A, B or C driver’s license has been issued as required by 49 CFR parts 383 and 384.

A licensee applying for a hazardous material endorsement on a driver’s license shall have a security background records check and shall receive clearance from the federal transportation security administration before the endorsement can be issued, renewed or transferred as required by 49 CFR part 383, subject to procedures established by the federal transportation security administration.

A licensee who desires to donate any or all organs or tissue in the event of death, and who has completed a document of gift pursuant to the provisions for donation of anatomical gifts as set forth in chapter 34, title 39, Idaho Code, may, at the option of the donor, indicate this desire on the driver’s license by the imprinting of the word “donor” on the license. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to licensees fifteen (15) years of age or older but less than eighteen (18) years of age if the requirements provided in chapter 34, title 39, Idaho Code, have been complied with and the donor indicates this desire be placed on the license.

A licensee who is a person with a permanent disability may request that the notation “permanently disabled” be imprinted on the driver’s license, provided the licensee presents written certification from a licensed physician verifying that the licensee’s stated impairment qualifies as a permanent disability according to the provisions of section 49-117, Idaho Code.

A licensee who is a veteran may request that his or her status as such be designated on the driver’s license at no additional cost. Any such request shall be accompanied by proof of being a current or former member of the United States armed forces. Upon request and submission of satisfactory proof, the department shall indicate such person’s status as a veteran on any class of driver’s license issued pursuant to this section. Such designation shall be made upon original issuance or renewal of a driver’s license. Designation shall also be made on any duplicate driver’s license issued, provided that the fee for such duplicate driver’s license is paid in accordance with section 49-306, Idaho Code.
Satisfactory proof of being a current or former member of the United States armed forces must be furnished by an applicant to the department before a designation of veteran status will be indicated on any class of driver’s license. Acceptable proof shall be a copy of form DD214 or an equivalent document or statement from the department of veterans affairs that identifies a character of service upon separation as “honorable” or “general under honorable conditions.”

§ 49-316. Driver’s license to be carried and exhibited on demand.

Every licensee shall have his driver’s license in his immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle and shall, upon demand, surrender the driver’s license into the hands of a peace officer for his inspection. However, no person charged with a violation of the provisions of this section shall be convicted if a driver’s license issued to the person and valid at the time of his arrest is produced in court.

§ 49-317. Restricted driver’s licenses.

The department, upon issuing a driver’s license, shall have authority whenever good cause appears to impose restrictions suitable to the licensee’s driving ability with respect to:

The type of or special mechanical control devices required or not permitted on a motor vehicle which the licensee may operate;

Medical variances as determined by the federal motor carrier safety administration; or

Other restrictions applicable to the licensee as the department may determine to be appropriate to assure the safe operation of a motor vehicle by the licensee.

The department may either issue a special restricted driver’s license or may set forth restrictions upon the usual driver’s license form.

The department shall, upon receiving satisfactory evidence of any violation of the restrictions of a driver’s license, suspend the driver’s license or privileges for a period of thirty (30) days but the licensee shall be entitled to a hearing as provided in section 49-326, Idaho Code.

§ 49-318. Duplicate driver licenses and substitute permits.

The holder of any instruction permit, class A, B, C or D, restricted school attendance driving permit, or seasonal driver’s license which is lost or destroyed, or a licensee whose name is legally changed, may apply for a duplicate driver’s license or substitute permit. A duplicate driver’s license or substitute permit will be issued upon:

Payment of the fee as provided in section 49-306, Idaho Code;

Furnishing satisfactory proof that the permit, class A, B, C or D, restricted school attendance driving permit, or seasonal driver’s license has been lost or destroyed, or that the licensee’s name has been legally changed; and

Furnishing proof of the applicant’s identity acceptable to the examiner or the department and date of birth as set forth in a certified copy of his birth certificate when obtainable, or another document which provides evidence of a person’s date of birth acceptable to the examiner or department. In the case of a name change, the applicant shall provide legal documentation acceptable to the department to verify the change.

A duplicate driver’s license or substitute permit shall not be issued, as provided in subsection (1) of this section, if the license or permit is suspended, revoked, canceled or disqualified in this state or any other jurisdiction or if the applicant has applied for, or has been issued, a license or permit in another jurisdiction.

The holder of any instruction permit, class A, B, C or D, restricted school attendance driving permit, or seasonal driver’s license who requests a duplicate driver’s license or substitute permit as provided in subsection (1) of this section, may request that the notation “permanently disabled” be imprinted on the permit or license and the department shall imprint “permanently disabled” on the permit or license if:

The person has a permanent disability; and

The person presents written certification from a licensed physician verifying that the person’s stated impairment qualifies as a permanent disability as provided in section 49-117, Idaho Code; and

The department determines that the person meets the requirements for issuance of a permit or license as specified in section 49-313, Idaho Code.

§ 49-319. Expiration and renewal of driver’s license.

Every noncommercial Idaho driver’s license issued to a driver shall expire and be renewable as follows:

Twenty-one (21) years of age or older shall expire on the licensee’s birthday in the fourth year following the issuance of the driver’s license.

At the option of the applicant, for drivers twenty-one (21) years of age through sixty-two (62) years of age, the driver’s license shall expire either on the licensee’s birthday in the fourth year or the eighth year following the issuance of the driver’s license.

Except for the provisions found in subsections (1)(e) and (3) of this section, every driver’s license issued to a driver under eighteen (18) years of age shall expire five (5) days after the licensee’s eighteenth birthday.

Except for the provisions found in subsections (1)(e) and (3) of this section, every driver’s license issued to a driver eighteen (18) years of age but under twenty-one (21) years of age shall expire five (5) days after the licensee’s twenty-first birthday.

Every driver’s license that is not, as provided by law, suspended, revoked or disqualified in this state or any other jurisdiction shall be renewable on or before its expiration, but not more than twenty-five (25) months before, upon application, payment of the required fee, and satisfactory completion of the required vision screening.

Except for the provisions found in subsection (3) of this section, every commercial driver’s license issued to a person twenty-one (21) years of age or older shall expire on the licensee’s birthday in the fourth year following issuance of the license, and any class A, B or C license issued to a person eighteen (18), nineteen (19) or twenty (20) years of age shall expire five (5) days after the licensee’s twenty-first birthday. There shall be no option for an eight-year class A, B or C license.

Every driver’s license issued to a person who is not a citizen or permanent legal resident of the United States shall have an expiration date that is the same date as the end of lawful stay in the United States as indicated on documents issued and verified by the department of homeland security, provided however, that the expiration date shall not extend beyond the expiration date for the same category of license issued to citizens. Persons whose department of homeland security documents do not state an expiration date shall be issued a driver’s license with an expiration date of one (1) year from the date of issuance. Fees shall be in accordance with the expiration periods and classes listed in section 49-306(1), Idaho Code.

An applicant who is issued a driver’s license in another jurisdiction after an Idaho driver’s license has been issued is not eligible for renewal or a duplicate of the Idaho driver’s license. The applicant may apply for a new Idaho driver’s license as provided in section 49-306, Idaho Code.

No knowledge test shall be required for renewal of a driver’s license, except for renewal of a hazardous material endorsement. Appropriate knowledge and skill tests shall be required for an upgrade in a driver’s license class or an endorsement addition. In the case of a name change, the applicant shall provide legal documentation to verify the change in accordance with department rules.

Applicants for a hazardous material endorsement shall provide either proof of United States citizenship or proof of lawful, permanent United States residence and a valid federal bureau of citizenship and immigration services alien registration number. A security background records check and federal transportation security administration clearance shall be required for issuance, renewal or transfer of a hazardous material endorsement in accordance with 49 CFR part 383, subject to procedures established by the federal transportation security administration.
(7) When a driver’s license has been expired for fewer than twenty-five (25) months, the renewal of the driver’s license shall start from the original date of expiration regardless of the year in which the application for renewal is made. If the driver’s license is expired for twenty-five (25) months or more, the applicant shall be required to take the appropriate knowledge test(s) and skills test(s) for the class of license or endorsement being applied for, and vision screening. The license shall expire on the licensee’s birthday in the fourth year following issuance of the driver’s license for drivers twenty-one (21) years of age or older, except as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(e) and (3) of this section. At the option of the applicant, for drivers twenty-one (21) years of age through sixty-two (62) years of age, the renewed license shall expire either on the licensee’s birthday in the fourth year or the eighth year following issuance, except as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(e) and (3) of this section.

The person has a permanent disability; and

The person presents written certification from a licensed physician, licensed physician assistant, or licensed advanced practice professional nurse verifying that the person’s stated impairment qualifies as a permanent disability as provided in section 49-117, Idaho Code; and

The department determines that the person meets the requirements for issuance of a license as specified in section 49-313, Idaho Code.

(8)(a) If a driver’s license has expired or will expire and the licensee is temporarily out of state, except on active military duty, and the driver’s license has not, as provided by law, been suspended, revoked, canceled, denied, refused or disqualified, the licensee may request in writing on a form prescribed by the department an extension of the driver’s license. The request shall be accompanied by the fee fixed in section 49-306, Idaho Code, and the extension shall be no more than a twelve (12) month period. If the department determines that an extension of the driver’s license is necessary, it may issue a license showing the date to which the expired driver’s license is extended. License extensions are limited to two (2) consecutive extensions per licensee.

(b) Upon returning to the state of Idaho, the licensee shall, within ten (10) days, apply for a renewal of the expired driver’s license and surrender the extended license and the expired driver’s license.

(c) A hazardous material endorsement cannot be extended.

(9) An Idaho driver’s license issued to any person prior to serving on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, or a member of the immediate family accompanying such a person, if valid and in full force and effect upon entering active duty, shall remain in full force and effect and shall, upon application, be extended for a period of four (4) years so long as active duty continues, or shall be renewed upon application in person without the requirement to take a knowledge or skills test if their Idaho driver’s license expired while on active duty, if the driver’s license is not suspended, denied, disqualified, canceled or revoked, as provided by law, during the active duty, and the driver’s license shall remain in full force and effect sixty (60) days following the date the holder is released from active duty.

(10) The department may use a mail renewal process for four-year class D licenses based on criteria established by rule.

(11) A seasonal driver’s license is only valid for a one hundred eighty (180) day period from the date of issuance. Only one (1) seasonal driver’s license may be obtained in any twelve (12) month period, and may only be obtained twice in a driver’s lifetime.

(12) A person who applies for renewal of a license may request that the notation “permanently disabled” be imprinted on the license and the department shall imprint “permanently disabled” on the license if:

§ 49-320. Notice of change of address.

It is the responsibility of every licensed driver and every person applying for a driver’s license to keep a current address on file with the department.

Whenever any person after applying for or receiving a driver’s license shall move from the address shown in the application or in the driver’s license issued, that person shall, within thirty (30) days, notify the department in writing of the old and new addresses.

Whenever any statute or rule requires a driver to receive notice of any official action with regard to the person’s driver’s license or driving privileges taken or proposed by a court or the department, notification by first class mail at the address shown on the application for a driver’s license or at the address shown on the driver’s license or at the address given by the driver, shall constitute all the legal notice that is required.

It is an infraction for any person to fail to notify the department of a change of address as required by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

§ 49-321. Records to be kept by the department.

The department shall file every application for a driver’s license received by it and shall maintain suitable indices containing:

All applications denied and on each note the reason for denial;

All applications granted;

The name of every licensee whose driver’s license has been suspended, revoked, canceled, denied or disqualified by the department and after each name note the reasons for the action;

The driver’s license number for the applicant; and

The social security number of the applicant.

The department shall file the original or copy of the medical examiner’s certificates, medical exemption letters and skill performance evaluation certificates of all commercial driver’s license or instruction permit holders required to provide documentation of their physical qualification. The department shall maintain the document(s) for a period of three (3) years beyond the date the certificate or document was issued.

The department shall also file all accident reports and abstracts of court records of convictions received by it under the law from any jurisdiction and is authorized to forward records of convictions, suspensions or disqualifications to any jurisdiction. Records may be in either paper or electronic form. The department shall maintain convenient records or make suitable notations in order that an individual record of each licensee showing the convictions and the traffic accidents in which the licensee has been involved shall be readily ascertainable and available for consideration of the department upon any application for renewal of a driver’s license and at other suitable times.

The department of health and welfare, on or about the 25th day of each month shall, upon the request of the department, furnish the department a listing showing the name, age, county of residence, and residence address of each Idaho resident who has died during the preceding month. The listing shall be used only for purposes of updating the driver’s license files of the department and shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

The department, upon request by the office of the secretary of state, shall provide the office of the secretary of state with a digital copy of the driver’s license or identification card signature of a person who is an applicant for voter registration pursuant to section 34-409, Idaho Code.

§ 49-322. Authority of department to cancel driver’s license or instruction permit.

The department shall cancel any driver’s license, restricted school attendance driving permit, or instruction permit upon determining that the licensee or permittee was not entitled to the issuance of the driver’s license or instruction permit, or that the licensee or permittee failed to give the required or correct information in his application, or committed fraud in making the application.

Upon a cancellation, the licensee or permittee shall surrender the canceled driver’s license or canceled instruction permit to the department.

The department shall cancel a person’s commercial driver’s license upon determining that the class A, B or C licensee has falsified information. Upon cancellation of a class A, B or C driver’s license, the licensee shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of sixty (60) days.

The department shall decertify the medical status and initiate a downgrade of any driver who is required by the federal motor carrier safety administration to maintain a medical examiner’s certificate and/or medical exemption letter or skill performance evaluation certificate upon determining the person’s medical certification has expired or has been revoked or canceled. The department shall change the person’s driving status in the driver record to “not-certified,” within ten (10) days and shall mail a notification letter regarding the pending decertification and downgrade action to the driver’s last known address. The downgrade action shall occur no more than sixty (60) days from the date the “not-certified” status is posted to the record. Drivers can remove the “not-certified” medical status from their driving record by presenting a current and valid medical examiner’s certificate and/or medical exemption letter or skill performance evaluation certificate to the department or by submitting an application to the department requesting their medical status be changed to “Excepted.”

When a driver’s license has been canceled for reasons of impairment, incompetence or inability of the licensed driver to operate a motor vehicle safely as provided in section 49-303 or 49-326, Idaho Code, and the licensee has voluntarily surrendered his driver’s license, or when a licensed driver requests cancellation of his license for any of the same reasons stated in this subsection and he voluntarily surrenders his license, the licensee may be eligible for a no-fee identification card as provided in section 49-2444, Idaho Code.

§ 49-323. Suspending privileges of nonresidents and reporting convictions.

The privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the highways given to a nonresident shall be subject to suspension, disqualification or revocation by the department in a like manner and for a like cause as a driver’s license issued to a resident may be suspended, disqualified or revoked.

Upon receipt of a record of the conviction, suspension, disqualification or revocation in this state of a nonresident driver for any offense under the motor vehicle laws, the department shall forward a certified copy or electronic transfer of the record of the conviction, suspension, disqualification or revocation and its cause to the motor vehicle administrator in the state wherein the person so convicted is a resident and to the national driver register.

§ 49-324. Suspending resident’s license and privileges upon conviction, administrative action or court order in another state or jurisdiction.

The department shall suspend, disqualify or revoke the driver’s license or privilege of any resident of this state or the privilege of a nonresident to operate a motor vehicle in this state upon receiving notice of the conviction, administrative action or court order of that person in another state or jurisdiction of an offense which, if committed in this state, would be grounds for the suspension, disqualification or revocation of the driver’s license and privileges of the driver. The department shall forward a certified copy or electronic transfer to the national driver register.

§ 49-325. Mandatory revocation by department — Temporary restricted permit.

The department shall revoke the operating privilege of any driver upon receiving a record of the person’s conviction of any of the following offenses, when the conviction has become final, if the court has not ordered the suspension or revocation of the privilege:

Vehicular manslaughter;

Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used, except that a court of competent jurisdiction shall have exclusive authority to suspend or revoke operating privileges upon conviction of a violation of the provisions of section 18-8004 or 18-8006, Idaho Code;

Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement under oath to the department under any law relating to the ownership or operation of motor vehicles;

Conviction, or forfeiture of bail, upon three (3) charges of reckless driving committed within a period of twelve (12) months;

Conviction of a violation of the provisions of section 49-1301, Idaho Code. Revocation in this event shall be for a period of not less than one (1) year.

Whenever any driver’s license, permit or operating privilege has been revoked by the department on the basis of subsections (1)(b) through (1)(e) of this section, the department may issue a temporary restricted permit, except when restricted operating privileges are specifically prohibited by other provisions of law.

A temporary restricted permit shall specify the restrictions as to time and area of use and any further restrictions as the department, in its discretion, may impose.

A temporary restricted permit may be issued to grant noncommercial driving privileges, but no temporary restricted permit shall be issued which grants driving privileges to operate a commercial motor vehicle.

§ 49-326. Authority of department to suspend, disqualify or revoke driver’s license and privileges.

If the court has not ordered the suspension of a license or privileges, the department is authorized to suspend, disqualify or revoke the license or privileges of a driver without preliminary hearing upon a showing by its records or other sufficient evidence that the driver:

Has committed an offense for which mandatory revocation, suspension or disqualification of license or privileges is required upon conviction, court order or administrative action;

Has been convicted in any court in this state of an offense against a municipal ordinance which would have been grounds for suspension, revocation or disqualification of his driver’s license or privileges had the charge been prosecuted under a state law;

Is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle;

Any person who in the opinion of the department, based upon recommendation of the person’s personal physician, is afflicted with or subject to any condition which brings about momentary or prolonged lapses of consciousness or control, which is or may become chronic, or when the person is suffering from a physical or mental disability or disease serving to prevent him from exercising reasonable and ordinary control over a motor vehicle while operating it upon the streets and highways, or any person who is unable to understand highway signs, warning, regulating or directing traffic, is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle.

Any person who shall not have minimum visual acuity with or without corrective lenses of 20/40 in at least one (1) eye as determined by the Snellen system or other available systems is incompetent to operate a motor vehicle, however, the department shall have the authority to license such person upon the recommendation of an ophthalmologist or qualified physician and upon passage of a skills test. At 20/70 or more in both eyes with or without corrective lenses the department may suspend the driver’s license and privileges. Any person who applies for or receives any type of tax, welfare or other benefits or exemptions for the blind shall be presumed incompetent to operate a motor vehicle. This presumption can be overcome by any person whose vision can be corrected to a visual acuity of 20/40 or better in one (1) eye as documented by a licensed ophthalmologist or optometrist.

Any person, department, or political subdivision of the state of Idaho who receives an application for any type of tax, welfare, aid or other benefits or exemptions for the blind shall immediately forward the name, address, sex, date of birth, and date of application of the applicant to the department.

Any physician who has reason to believe that a patient is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle as defined in this subsection, may submit a report to the department. Before submitting a report, a physician should notify the patient or the patient’s family of the physician’s concerns about the patient’s ability to drive. If the physician submits a report, the physician shall provide a copy of the report to the patient or to a member of the patient’s family. If a physician submits a report in good faith, no professional disciplinary procedure, no monetary liability and no cause of action may arise against the physician for submission of the report;

Has permitted an unlawful or fraudulent use of a driver’s license;

Has committed an offense in another state or jurisdiction as evidenced by a conviction, court order or administrative action, which if committed in Idaho would be grounds for suspension, disqualification or revocation;

Has been convicted of the offense of reckless driving, or fleeing or attempting to elude a peace officer, and providing that the operating privilege shall be suspended for a period of thirty (30) days upon conviction and providing further, that if a second conviction occurs within a two (2) year period of time from the time of the first conviction, the suspension shall be for ninety (90) days, and if a third conviction shall occur within a three (3) year period of time from the time of the first conviction, the period of suspension shall be for one (1) year;

Has failed to satisfy a judgment as set forth in chapter 12, title 49, Idaho Code;

Has failed to maintain proof of financial responsibility as set forth in chapter 12, title 49, Idaho Code;

Has a driving record which shows a violation point count of twelve (12) or more points in any consecutive twelve (12) month period;

Is an habitual violator of traffic laws;

Has been convicted of the offense of violation of a restricted license and providing the driver’s license and privileges be suspended for a period of thirty (30) days;

Has been convicted for the offense of leaving the scene of an accident involving damages to a vehicle, the period of revocation shall be one (1) year;

Has been convicted for the offense of leaving the scene of an accident resulting in injury or death, the period of revocation shall be one (1) year;

Is under the age of eighteen (18) years and is not satisfactorily enrolled in school, has not received a waiver pursuant to or has not completed school as provided in section 49-303A, Idaho Code;

Was cited under the age of seventeen (17) years and subsequently received a conviction involving a moving traffic violation arising out of the operation of a motor vehicle, and providing the driver shall be sent a written warning from the Idaho transportation department for a first conviction; the driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of thirty (30) days for a second conviction; and the driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of sixty (60) days for a third or subsequent conviction; and providing further that no restricted driving privileges shall be issued during any period of suspension hereunder.

A violation point is assessed for conviction of any charge or with proof of any infraction involving a moving traffic violation. A value of one (1) point shall be given for a less serious violation and up to four (4) points for a more serious violation. Conviction or proof of infraction for only one (1) violation arising from one (1) occasion of arrest or citation shall be counted in determining the violation point count.

The department is authorized and directed to establish a violation point count system for various moving traffic violations and infractions occurring either within or without the state of Idaho, affecting all holders of driver’s licenses issued by the department.

Notification of suspension, revocation, cancellation or disqualification. Upon suspending, revoking, canceling or disqualifying the driver’s license or driving privileges of any person, the department shall immediately notify the applicant or licensee in writing, at the licensee’s address on file with the department pursuant to section 49-320, Idaho Code. Upon his request, the department shall afford him an opportunity for a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the director. The hearing may be held by telephone within twenty (20) days after receipt of the request, unless this period is for good cause shown, extended by the hearing officer for one ten (10) day period. The notice and hearing shall be required prior to the imposition of additional suspension or disqualification periods beyond the periods as set forth in this section. Upon a hearing, the hearing officer may administer oaths, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books and papers, and may require a reexamination of the licensee. Upon the hearing, the department shall either rescind its order or, with good cause, may affirm or extend the suspension or disqualification of the driver’s license or revoke the driver’s license.
Whenever a driver’s license, permit or driving privilege has been suspended or revoked by the department as provided in this section, other than as set forth in subsection (1)(c), (d), (g), (h), (m), (n) or (o) of this section, the department may issue a temporary restricted permit restricting the time, area and purpose of use. The application, eligibility requirements and form of the temporary restricted permit shall be provided by administrative rule. A temporary restricted permit may be issued to grant noncommercial driving privileges, but no temporary restricted permit shall be issued which grants driving privileges to operate a commercial motor vehicle.

The department shall not suspend or revoke a driver’s license or privileges for a period of more than one (1) year, unless otherwise provided by law. The provisions of this subsection shall not be applicable with respect to the issuance of temporary restricted permits as provided in section 49-325, Idaho Code, nor shall it be applicable to those suspensions placed on an individual’s record for the purpose of administering suspensions ordered to take effect after an individual’s release from confinement or imprisonment pursuant to chapter 80, title 18, Idaho Code.

The department shall not disqualify a driver for a period longer than specified by 49 CFR part 383.

§ 49-326A. Administration by department of judicial suspensions of driver’s licenses or privileges to become effective after release from confinement.

When a court’s judgment or order provides that the suspension of an individual’s driver’s license or driving privileges shall begin after the individual is released from confinement or imprisonment, the department, for purposes of administering the ordered suspension, shall consider the driver’s license or driving privileges as suspended effective as of the end of the last day of the fixed portion of the ordered sentence, as shown by the judgment or sentencing order of the court.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the suspension shall remain in effect until the individual applies for reinstatement of his or her driver’s license or driving privileges and can provide verifiable documentation to establish the date of release from confinement or imprisonment and show that the court-ordered suspension period has expired since the individual’s release. Upon such a showing, the department will reinstate the individual’s driver’s license or driving privileges as provided by law.

Where the department is notified of the release of the individual, either by the court or the agency having custody over the individual during the period of confinement or imprisonment, the department shall amend its records to reflect the actual court-ordered period of suspension.

No time credit against the court-ordered period of suspension will be given while the individual is incarcerated or if the individual is reincarcerated. The entire period of the court-ordered suspension must run after the individual is released from confinement or imprisonment.

§ 49-327. Surrender of driver’s license — Application for duplicate.

Upon suspending, canceling or revoking a driver’s license, the department shall require that the driver’s license be surrendered to the department. At the end of the period of suspension, revocation or cancellation the driver may apply for a duplicate driver’s license, provided that the driver is eligible and has fulfilled all reinstatement requirements.

If any person shall fail to return to the department the Idaho driver’s license as required, the department may direct any peace officer to secure its possession and return the driver’s license to the department.

§ 49-328. Reinstatement of revoked, disqualified or suspended driver’s license — Fee — When reinstatement prohibited.

When the period of revocation, disqualification or suspension of a driver’s license has expired, or the reason for the revocation, disqualification or suspension no longer exists, the department shall reinstate the driver’s license or driving privileges on application of the driver.

The application shall be in the form prescribed by the department and accompanied by a reinstatement fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) which shall be deposited in the state highway account.

A driver’s license shall not be suspended for failure to pay an infraction penalty. All driver’s licenses suspended prior to July 1, 2018, for failure to pay an infraction penalty shall be reinstated upon application and without charge to the applicant.

In addition to any other fees required in this section to be collected, the department shall collect sixty dollars ($60.00) for reinstating a driver’s license after conviction for driving under the influence, without privileges, and after conviction or other violation of any other traffic-related misdemeanor or infraction, of which fees forty dollars ($40.00) shall be paid over to the county treasurer of the county in which the conviction occurred for support of that county’s justice fund, or the current expense fund if no county justice fund has been established, and the twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be deposited in the state highway account.

In addition to any other fees required in this section to be collected, the department shall collect two hundred dollars ($200) for reinstating a driver’s license after a suspension imposed under the provisions of section 18-8002 or section 18-8002A, Idaho Code, or after a revocation, disqualification or suspension arising out of any alcohol or drug-related offense, other than a suspension imposed upon a person under eighteen (18) years of age pursuant to section 18-1502(d), Idaho Code. Funds collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the state highway account.

When there is more than one (1) reason why a driver’s license was revoked or suspended or why a driver was disqualified, the department shall not collect multiple fees for reinstatement, but shall only collect one (1) reinstatement fee, which shall be the greater reinstatement fee, provided however, the department shall collect a reinstatement fee for each revocation, disqualification or suspension under chapter 80, title 18, Idaho Code.